Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-7905
Purposes of act.

The purposes of the
Health Care Quality Improvement Act are to provide protection for those individuals
who participate in peer review activities which evaluate the quality and efficiency
of health care providers and to protect the confidentiality of peer review
records.

Laws 2011, LB431, § 2.